Hawaii statutes.
PART VIII. USE OF SENIOR-SPECIFIC CERTIFICATIONS

AND PROFESSIONAL DESIGNATIONS

Note

Part heading amended by L 2012, c 34, §10.

[§431:10D-641] Purpose. The
purpose of this part is to protect consumers from misleading and fraudulent
marketing practices with respect to the use of senior-specific certifications
and professional designations in the solicitation of, sale of, or purchase of,
or advice given in connection with a life insurance or annuity product. [L
2011, c 108, pt of §7]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next